Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.370

Sealing of records—Recommendations.

The judicial information system committee's data dissemination committee shall develop recommendations on best practices for courts to consider for whether and when the sealing of records in protection order cases is appropriate or necessary under this chapter. The committee shall also consider methods to ensure compliance with the provisions of the federal violence against women act under 18 U.S.C. Sec. 2265(d)(3) that prohibit internet publication of filing or registration information of protection orders when such publication is likely to reveal the identity or location of the person protected by the order.

[ 2021 c 215 s 51.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.